Missouri, session 2026, HB1619.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 253, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 253.178, to read as follows:
253.178. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
2 department of natural resources shall use not less than ten percent of any state or
3 federal moneys appropriated for the development of the Rock Island Trail State Park to
4 address adjacent landowner concerns such as agricultural fencing, agricultural
5 crossings, drainage, signage, safety, and security.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.